examples/apertium-tet.tet.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AÁBDEÉFGHIÍJKLMNÑOÓPRSTUÚVXZWQYCÇÃÕÂÊÔaábdeéfghiíjklmnñoóprstuúvxzwqycçãõâêô</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="Existential 'hay'"/>
    <sdef n="postadv"  c="Postadverb"/>
    <sdef n="predet"   c="Predeterminer"/>
    <sdef n="postdet"  c="Postdeterminer"/>
    <sdef n="cla"      c="Classifier"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"       c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="foc"      c="Focus word"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="rel"      c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="preverb"  c="Pre-verbal"/>
    <sdef n="postverb" c="Post-verbal"/>

    <sdef n="iv"       c="Intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="tv"       c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="caus"     c="Causative"/>

    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular"/>

    <sdef n="m"        c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"        c="Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="ant"      c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"      c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="ref"      c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="pos"      c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"      c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord"      c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="dem"      c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"      c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="rec"      c="Reciprocal"/>
    <sdef n="top"      c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="org"      c="Organisation"/>

    <sdef n="hon"      c="Honorific"/>

    <sdef n="p1"       c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p1n"      c="First person (inclusive)"/>
    <sdef n="p1x"      c="First person (exclusive)"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="cm"       c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"     c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"     c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="percent"  c="Percentage"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"     c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"    c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"    c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"     c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="apos"     c="Apostrophe"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs> 

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e><re>[’'‘]</re><p><l/><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>       <p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>–</l><r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km²</l><r><b/>km²<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Miscellaneous -->

    <pardef n="mak__foc">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="foc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="na'in__cla">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cla"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lai__postverb">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="postverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="foin__preverb">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="liu__postadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="postadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lisensa__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="i__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="katak__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la'ós__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="ba__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="sira__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nian__postdet">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="postdet"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kada__predet">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="predet"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nia__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hotu__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ida-idak__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="né'e__det">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="nia__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sira__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ita__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="hon"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ami__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="o__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hau__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ne'ebé__rel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ida-idak__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="né'e__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="saida__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="malu__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rec"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="ida__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rua__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="novi__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tokon__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="uma__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="violé/nsia__n">
      <e><p><l>nsia</l><r>nsia<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ncia</l><r>nsia<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="pov/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>u<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="film/i__n">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="restorant/e__n">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <e lm="mak"><i>mak</i><par n="mak__foc"/></e>
    <e lm="maka" r="LR"><p><l>maka</l><r>mak</r></p><par n="mak__foc"/></e>
    <e lm="dadauk" r="LR"><p><l>daudaun</l><r>dadauk</r></p><par n="lai__postverb"/></e>
    <e lm="tiha"><i>tiha</i><par n="lai__postverb"/></e>
    <e lm="atu"><i>atu</i><par n="foin__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="seidauk"><i>seidauk</i><par n="foin__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="ou"><i>ou</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ka"><i>ka</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="katak"><i>katak</i><par n="katak__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kuandu"><i>kuandu</i><par n="la'ós__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="maske" r="LR"><p><l>mazke</l><r>maske</r></p><par n="la'ós__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="fuan"><i>fuan</i><par n="na'in__cla"/></e>
    <e lm="butuk"><i>butuk</i><par n="na'in__cla"/></e>
    <e lm="to'o"><i>to'o</i><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kona-ba" r="LR"><p><l>koná-ba</l><r>kona-ba</r></p><par n="ba__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ninian"><i>ninian</i><par n="nian__postdet"/></e>
    <e lm="ninian" r="LR"><p><l>ni-nian</l><r>ninian</r></p><par n="nian__postdet"/></e>
    <e lm="imi nia"><i>imi<b/>nia</i><par n="nia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ita nia" r="LR"><p><l>ita-nia</l><r>ita<b/>nia</r></p><par n="nia__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sira"><i>sira</i><par n="sira__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ne'ebá"><i>ne'ebá</i><par n="né'e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nee" r="LR"><p><l>né'<b/>e</l><r>né'e</r></p><par n="né'e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="bar-barak" r="LR"><p><l>barbarak</l><r>bar-barak</r></p><par n="hotu__det"/></e>
    <e lm="lubuk"><i>lubuk</i><par n="ida-idak__det"/></e>
    <e lm="oi-oin" r="LR"><p><l>oin-oin</l><r>oi-oin</r></p><par n="ida-idak__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hotu"><i>hotu</i><par n="hotu__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kada"><i>kada</i><par n="kada__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="naran"><i>naran</i><par n="kada__predet"/></e>
    <e lm="ha'u"><i>ha'u</i><par n="hau__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ha'u" r="LR"><p><l>hau</l><r>ha'u</r></p><par n="hau__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="o__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ita"><i>ita</i><par n="ita__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nia"><i>nia</i><par n="nia__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ami"><i>ami</i><par n="ami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="imi"><i>imi</i><par n="imi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sira"><i>sira</i><par n="sira__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="saida"><i>saida</i><par n="saida__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="malu"><i>malu</i><par n="malu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="né'e"><i>né'e</i><par n="né'e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nee" r="LR"><p><l>né'<b/>e</l><r>né'e</r></p><par n="né'e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ne'ebé" r="LR"><p><l>ne'<b/>ebé</l><r>ne'ebé</r></p><par n="ne'ebé__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="ne'ebé" r="LR"><p><l>n'ebé</l><r>ne'ebé</r></p><par n="ne'ebé__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="ida-idak" r="LR"><p><l>idaidak</l><r>ida-idak</r></p><par n="ida-idak__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="buat ruma"><i>buat<b/>ruma</i><par n="ida-idak__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ida"><i>ida</i><par n="ida__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sanulu resin tolu"><i>sanulu<b/>resin<b/>tolu</i><par n="rua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hitu-nulu"><i>hitu-nulu</i><par n="rua__num"/></e>
    <e lm="atus ba atus"><i>atus<b/>ba<b/>atus</i><par n="tokon__num"/></e>
    <e lm="novi"><i>novi</i><par n="novi__num"/></e>
    <e lm="pasaporti"><i>pasaport</i><par n="film/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pezka"><i>pezka</i><par n="uma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="formandu"><i>formand</i><par n="pov/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potensialidade"><i>potensialidad</i><par n="restorant/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konsiénsia"><i>konsié</i><par n="violé/nsia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolaborasaun"><i>kolaborasaun</i><par n="uma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="demais"><i>demais</i><par n="liu__postadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tebe-tebes" r="LR"><p><l>tebtebes</l><r>tebe-tebes</r></p><par n="liu__postadv"/></e>
    <e lm="parabéns"><i>parabéns</i><par n="lisensa__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nada"><i>nada</i><par n="lisensa__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
